Utah statutes.
49-20-410.   High deductible health plan -- Health savings account -- Contributions.

(1) (a)  In addition to other employee benefit plans offered under this part, the office shall offer a high deductible health plan with a federally qualified health savings account as an optional health plan.

(b)  The provisions and limitations of the plan shall be determined by the office in accordance with federal requirements and limitations.

(2) (a)  The office shall administer the high deductible health plan in coordination with the health savings account so that the impact on the covered employer's overall health plan is actuarially neutral.

(b)  The office shall offer the federally qualified health savings account for medical expenses for each covered individual in the high deductible health plan.

(3) (a)  Contributions to the health savings account may be made by the employer.

(b)  The amount of the contributions under Subsection (3)(a) shall be determined annually by the office, after consultation with the covered employer, or on behalf of the state as an employer, the Department of Human Resource Management and the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget, based on:

(i)  federal requirements and limitations; and

(ii)  the actuarial value of the risk-adjusted high deductible to the office.

(c)  An employee may also make contributions to the health savings account.

